Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.001

Purpose—Applicability. (Effective August 1, 2024.)

(1) The purposes of this chapter are:

(a) To clarify the exemptions from attachment, execution, and forced sale that apply after a decedent's death;

(b) To establish a procedure for allocating the exempt property among claimants; and

(c) To establish a procedure by which the decedent's surviving spouse, surviving registered domestic partner, or surviving dependent children may request basic financial support during the pendency of any proceedings under this title relating to the decedent's probate or nonprobate assets.

(2) This chapter applies to probate and nonprobate assets.

[ 2024 c 20 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 20: "This act takes effect August 1, 2024." [ 2024 c 20 s 14.]

Savings—2024 c 20: "(1) No act done in any proceeding commenced before August 1, 2024, and no accrued right shall be impaired by any provision of this act.

(2) When a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time which has commenced to run by the provisions of any statute in force before August 1, 2024, those provisions shall remain in force and be deemed a part of this act with respect to that right.

(3) The procedures in effect before August 1, 2024, shall apply to any proceeding to the extent that in the opinion of the court the application of the procedures under this act would not be feasible or would work injustice." [ 2024 c 20 s 15.]